Maryland, session 2026, SB0572.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
12–906.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO CHARLES COUNTY.
(B) BEGINNING IN 2027, THE GOVERNING BODY OF CHARLES COUNTY MAY,
BY LOCAL LAW, GRANT TO AN INSPECTOR GENERAL ESTABLISHED BY THE COUNTY
THE SAME AUTHORITY OVER CHARLES COUNTY PUBLIC SCHOOLS THAT AN
INSPECTOR GENERAL WOULD HAVE OVER A DEPARTMENT OF COUNTY
GOVERNMENT.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0572*

SENATE BILL 572
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the General
Assembly that if the governing body of Charles County adopts a local law to grant an
inspector general established by the county authority over Charles County Public Schools
under Section 1 of this Act, the local law shall take effect at the beginning of the term
following the initial term of the inspector general established by the county.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.